en: alcohol vinegar
bg: алкохолен оцет
ca: vinagre d'alcohol
cs: ocet kvasný lihový
da: lagereddike
de: Alkoholessig
es: vinagre de alcohol
fr: vinaigre d’alcool
hr: alkoholni ocat
hu: alkoholecet
it: aceto di alcool, aceto d alcol
nl: alcoholazijn
pt: vinagre de álcool
ro: oțet de alcool, oțet din alcool
sv: ättiksprit

en: alcohol vinegar powder
fr: poudre de vinaigre d'alcool
hr: alkoholni ocat u prahu
it: aceto di alcol in polvere
ro: oţet praf din alcool, otet praf din alcool

en: fruit vinegar
de: Obstessig
hr: voćni ocat
it: aceto di frutta
ru: уксус из пищевого сырья

en: apple vinegar
bg: ябълков оцет
ca: Vinagre de poma
de: Apfelessig
es: vinagre de manzana
fr: vinaigre de pomme
hr: jabučni ocat
it: aceto di mele
ja: リンゴ酢
nl: appelazijn
pl: ocet jabłkowy

en: cider vinegar
ar: خل التفاح
de: Zideressig
el: ξύδi απó μήλiτή
es: vinagre de sidra
fa: سرکه سیب
fi: siiderietikka
fr: vinaigre de cidre
hr: jabukovača ocat
it: aceto sidro
nl: ciderazijn
pl: ocet cydrowy
pt: vinagre de sidra
sv: cidervinäger

en: apple cider vinegar
bn: আপেল সিডার ভিনেগার
da: æblecidereddike, æbleeddike
de: Apfelweinessig
es: vinagre de sidra de manzana
fi: omenasiiderietikka
fr: vinaigre de cidre de pomme
he: חומץ תפוחים
hu: almaecet
it: aceto di sidro di mele
ko: 사과식초
nl: appelciderazijn
nn: eplecidereddik
pl: ocet z cydru jabłkowego
ru: яблочный уксус
sr: јабуково сирће
sv: äppelcidervinäger
uk: яблучний оцет
vi: Giấm táo
zh: 苹果醋片

en: balsamic vinegar
ar: خل بلسميك
bg: балсамов оцет
bs: balzamovo sirće
ca: vinagre balsàmic
cs: balzámový ocet
da: balsamicoeddike
de: Balsamessig, Balsamico
el: βαλσαμικό ξύδι
eo: balzamvinagro
es: aceto balsámico, vinagre balsamico
eu: ozpin baltsamiko
fa: سرکه بالزامیک
fi: balsamietikka, balsamiviinietikka, balsamico
fr: vinaigre balsamique
hr: balsamico ocat
hu: balzsamecet
it: aceto balsamico
ja: バルサミコ酢
ka: ყურძნის წვენი
ko: 발사믹 식초
lt: balzaminis actas
nb: balsamico
nl: balsamico, balsamicoazijn, balsamico-azijn
pl: ocet balsamiczny, octu balsamicznego
pt: vinagre balsâmico
ru: бальзамический уксус
sv: balsamvinäger
uk: бальзамічний оцет
zh: 意大利香醋

en: balsamic vinegar of modena, modena balsamic vinegar
de: Balsamessig aus Modena, Balsamico-Essig aus Modena g.g.A., Aceto Balsamico di Modena I.G.P.
es: vinagre balsamico de modena
fr: vinaigre balsamique de modène
hr: balzamski ocat iz modene, aceto balsamico di modena
it: aceto balsamico di modena
pl: ocet balsamiczny z Modeny

en: white balsamic vinegar
bg: бял балсамов оцет
da: hvid balsamicoeddike
de: weißer balsamico Essig
el: λευκό βαλσαμικό ξύδι
fi: vaalea balsamietikka, valkoinen balsamiviinietikka
fr: vinaigre balsamique blanc
hr: bijeli balsamico ocat
hu: fehér balzsamecet
it: aceto balsamico bianco
pl: biały ocet balsamiczny
sv: vit balsamvinäger

en: condiment with white balsamic
fr: condiment balsamique blanc
hr: začiniti bijelim balzamikom
it: Condimento con balsamico bianco

en: grain vinegar
de: Getreideessig
fr: Vinaigre de céréales
hr: žitni ocat
it: Aceto di cereali

en: corn vinegar
fr: vinaigre de maïs
hr: kukuruzni ocat
it: aceto di mais
nl: maisazijn
pl: ocet kukurydziany

en: malt vinegar
bg: малцов оцет
de: Malzessig
es: vinagre de malta
et: linnaseäädikas
fi: mallasetikka
fr: vinaigre de malt
hr: sladni ocat
hu: malátaecet
it: aceto di malto
lt: salyklo actas
nl: Moutazijn
pl: ocet słodowy, ocet ze słodu
pt: Vinagre de malte
sv: maltvinäger

en: barley malt vinegar, malt barley vinegar
de: gerstenmalzessig
fi: ohramallasetikka
fr: vinaigre de malt d'orge
hr: slad ječma
it: aceto di malto d'orzo
nl: gerstemoutazijn
pl: ocet ze słodu jęczmiennego
sv: kornmaltsvinäger

en: spirit- and white wine vinegar
de: Alkohol- und Weisweinessig
fi: viini- ja valkoviinietikka
fr: vinaigres d'alcool et de vin blanc
hr: alkohol- i bijeli vinski ocat
hu: alkohol- és fehérborecet
it: aceti d'alcool e di vino bianco
nl: alcohol- en witte wijnazijn

en: rice vinegar, rice wine vinegar
bg: оризов оцет
ca: vinagre d'arròs
de: Reisessig, Reisweinessig
el: ξύδι ρυζιού
eo: rizvinagro
es: vinagre de arroz
fi: riisiviinietikka, riisietikka
fr: vinaigre de riz
gl: Vinagre de arroz
he: חומץ אורז
hr: rižin ocat
hu: rizsecet
id: Cuka beras
it: Aceto di riso
ja: 米酢
ko: 쌀식초
nl: rijstazijn
pl: Ocet ryżowy, octu ryżowego
ru: Рисовый уксус
sv: risvinäger, risvinvinäger
uk: Рисовий оцет
zh: 米醋

en: sherry vinegar
de: Sherry Wein Essig
es: Vinagre de Jerez
fi: sherryviinietikka
fr: vinaigre de xérès
hr: sherry ocat
it: aceto di sherry

en: table vinegar
de: Tafelessig
es: Vinagre de mesa
fi: pöytäetikka
fr: vinaigre de table
hr: stolni ocat
hu: ételecet
it: aceto da tavola
nl: tafelazijn

en: red wine vinegar
bg: червен винен оцет
da: Rødvinseddike, rødvinseddikke
de: Rotweinessig
es: Vinagre de vino tinto
fi: punaviinietikka
fr: vinaigre de vin rouge
hr: crni vinski ocat
hu: vörösborecet
it: aceto di vino rosso
nl: rode wijnazijn
pl: ocet winny czerwony, ocet z czerwonego wina, ocet winny z czerwonego wina
sv: rödvinsvinäger

en: spirit vinegar
bg: спиртен оцет
cs: Ovocný ocet
de: Branntweinessig, Weingeistessig
el: ξύδι από οίνο
fi: väkiviinaetikka
fr: vinaigre d'eau-de-vie
hu: szeszecet
it: aceto di acqua-vite
lv: spirta etiķis
nl: brandewijnazijn
pl: Ocet spirytusowy, octu spirytusowego
uk: оцет спиртовий